ro-RO: Formă capăt pensulă: 360 de grade; Cap compact; Cap complet; Tăietură ortodontică în V; Modul înlocuibil; În formă de U; Cap lat; Altele
lt-LT: Šepetėlio galvutės forma: 360 laipsnių; Kompaktiška galvutė; Pilna galvutė; Ortodontinio V formos pjūvio; Keičiamas modulis; U formos; Plati galvutė; Kita
zh-CN: 刷头形状: 360 度; 紧凑型刷头; 全刷头; 正畸 V 形切口; 可替换模块; U 形; 宽刷头; 其他
el: Σχήμα κεφαλής βούρτσας: 360 μοιρών; Συμπαγής κεφαλή; Πλήρης κεφαλή; Ορθοδοντική κοπή V; Αντικαταστάσιμη μονάδα; Σε σχήμα U; Πλατιά κεφαλή; Άλλο
nl: Vorm borstelkop: 360 graden; Compacte kop; Volledige kop; Orthodontische V-snede; Vervangbare module; U-vormig; Brede kop; Andere
pt-BR: Formato da cabeça da escova: 360 graus; Cabeça compacta; Cabeça completa; Corte em V ortodôntico; Módulo substituível; Em forma de U; Cabeça larga; Outro
de: Bürstenkopfform: 360-Grad; Kompaktkopf; Vollkopf; Kieferorthopädischer V-Schnitt; Austauschbares Modul; U-förmig; Breiter Kopf; Sonstiges
da: Børstehovedform: 360-graders; Kompakt hoved; Fuldt hoved; Ortodontisk V-klip; Udskifteligt modul; U-formet; Bredt hoved; Andet
bg-BG: Форма на главата на четката: 360-градусова; Компактна глава; Пълна глава; Ортодонтска V-образна; Сменяем модул; U-образна; Широка глава; Други
sk-SK: Tvar hlavice kefy: 360-stupňová; Kompaktná hlavica; Plná hlavica; Ortodontický V-strih; Vymeniteľný modul; V tvare písmena U; Široká hlavica; Iné
vi: Hình dạng đầu bàn chải: 360 độ; Đầu nhỏ gọn; Đầu đầy đủ; Cắt chữ V niềng răng; Mô-đun thay thế; Hình chữ U; Đầu rộng; Khác
pl: Kształt główki szczoteczki: 360 stopni; Główka kompaktowa; Główka pełnowymiarowa; Ortodontyczna z wycięciem V; Wymienny moduł; U-kształtny; Główka szeroka; Inne
zh-TW: 刷頭形狀: 360 度; 小巧刷頭; 完整刷頭; 矯正 V 型切口; 可替換模組; U 型; 寬刷頭; 其他
hr-HR: Oblik glave četke: 360 stupnjeva; Kompaktna glava; Puna glava; Ortodontski V rez; Zamjenjivi modul; U obliku slova U; Široka glava; Ostalo
sv: Borsthuvudform: 360-graders; Kompakt huvud; Fullhuvud; Ortodontisk V-skärning; Utbytbar modul; U-formad; Brett huvud; Övrigt
sl-SI: Oblika glave ščetke: 360-stopinjska; Kompaktna glava; Polna glava; Ortodontski V-rez; Zamenljiv modul; V obliki črke U; Široka glava; Drugo
en: Brush head shape: 360-degree; Compact head; Full head; Orthodontic V-cut; Replaceable module; U-shaped; Wide head; Other
pt-PT: Formato da cabeça da escova: 360 graus; Cabeça compacta; Cabeça completa; Corte em V ortodôntico; Módulo substituível; Em forma de U; Cabeça larga; Outro
ja: ブラシヘッド形状: 360度; コンパクトヘッド; フルヘッド; 矯正用Vカット; 交換式モジュール; U型; ワイドヘッド; その他
fr: Forme du pinceau: 360 degrés; Tête compacte; Tête complète; Coupe en V orthodontique; Module remplaçable; En forme de U; Tête large; Autre
it: Forma della testina dello spazzolino: 360 gradi; Testina compatta; Testina completa; Taglio a V ortodontico; Modulo sostituibile; A forma di U; Testina larga; Altro
es: Forma del cabezal del cepillo: 360 grados; Cabezal compacto; Cabezal completo; Corte en V ortodóntico; Módulo reemplazable; En forma de U; Cabezal ancho; Otros
nb: Børstehodeform: 360-graders; Kompakt hode; Fullt hode; Ortodontisk V-kutt; Utskiftbar modul; U-formet; Bredt hode; Annet
ru: Форма головки щетки: 360 градусов; Компактная головка; Полноразмерная головка; Ортодонтическая V-образная; Сменный модуль; U-образная; Широкая головка; Другой
cs: Tvar hlavice kartáčku: 360stupňová; Kompaktní hlavice; Plná hlavice; Ortodontický V-střih; Vyměnitelný modul; Tvar písmene U; Široká hlavice; Jiné
fi: Silveltimen pään muoto: 360 astetta; Kompakti pää; Täysipää; Oikomishoidon V-leikkaus; Vaihdettava moduuli; U-muotoinen; Leveä pää; Muu
ko: 브러시 헤드 형태: 360도; 컴팩트 헤드; 풀 헤드; 교정용 V컷; 교체 가능 모듈; U자형; 와이드 헤드; 기타
tr: Fırça başlığı şekli: 360 derece; Kompakt başlık; Tam başlık; Ortodontik V kesim; Değiştirilebilir modül; U şekilli; Geniş başlık; Diğer
th: รูปร่างหัวแปรง: 360 องศา; หัวกะทัดรัด; หัวเต็ม; ตัด V สำหรับจัดฟัน; โมดูลเปลี่ยนได้; รูปตัว U; หัวกว้าง; อื่นๆ
hu: Kefefej alakja: 360 fokos; Kompakt fej; Teljes fej; Fogszabályozós V-vágás; Cserélhető modul; U alakú; Széles fej; Egyéb